apertium-guc-spa.guc.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Nombre común"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculino"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculino / feminino"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verbo"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Número"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitivo"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Presente de indicativo"/>
    <sdef n="p1"      c="Primera persona"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Segunda persona"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Tercera persona"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverbio"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjetivo"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogativo"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Nombre propio"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Conjunción coordinada"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminino"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Antroponim"/>
    <sdef n="nn"      c="Inanimado"/>
    <sdef n="aa"      c="Animado"/>
    <sdef n="ali"     c="Nombre Alineable"/>
    <sdef n="ina"     c="Inanileable"/>
    <sdef n="ut"      c="No masculino"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Coma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrofo"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Guión"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Etiqueta de fin de oración"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjección"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposición"/>
    <sdef n="post"    c="Postposición"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuación -->

    <pardef n="guionet">    
      <e><p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">    
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aposchar">    
      <e><i>'</i></e>
      <e r="LR" i="yes"><p><l>’</l><r>'</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">    
      <e><par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">    
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">    
      <e><re>[.\?;¡:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECCIÓN: Conjunciones -->

    <pardef n="juma'a__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aashin__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECCIÓN: Nombres -->

    <pardef n="ipa'__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irrua</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="musa__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irrua</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kalina__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irrua</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="juya__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="seita__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Jaime__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Laura__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="teclado__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	
    
     <pardef n="contraseña__n">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ka</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 	
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="maleiwa__n">    
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> </p></e>
     </pardef>


    <!-- SECCIÓN: Adverbios -->

    <pardef n="yaa__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="hoy__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!--SECCIÓN: Adjetivos -->

     <pardef n="jemiai__adj">
       <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <!-- SECCIÓN: Verbos -->

    <pardef n="jala/a__vblex">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>shi</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sü</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>shii</l><r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="achumajaa__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>   
    <pardef n="jamaya__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>    
    
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="juma'a"><i>juma'a</i><par n="juma'a__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="karateera"><i>karateera</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seita"><i>seita</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maawüi"><i>maawüi</i><par n="teclado__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atünajutü"><i>atünajutü</i><par n="jemiai__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="eküülü"><i>eküülü</i><par n="teclado__n"/></e>
    <e lm="wopu"><i>wopu</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yonna"><i>kyonna</i><par n="teclado__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atüna"><i>atüna</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asatala"><i>asatala</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yolujaa"><i>yolujaa</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maleiwa"><i>maleiwa</i><par n="maleiwa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senkeyuu"><i>senkeyuu</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jima'ai"><i>jima'ai</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="je'yulu"><i>je'yulu</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="pisaalü"><i>pisaalü</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="aüliijana"><i>aüliijana</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="ano'u"><i>ano'u</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="awala"><i>awala</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="laapi"><i>laapi</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="ai."><i>ai.</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
<e lm="ayaa"><i>ayaa</i><par n="juya__n"/></e>
    <e lm="shüliuala"><i>shüliuala</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kai"><i>kai</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lapu'"><i>lapu'</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aa'inmajia"><i>aa'inmajia</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aapajülü"><i>aapajülü</i><par n="teclado__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aashaje'erülü"><i>aashaje'erülü</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="achekajia"><i>achekajia</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="achikanainjia"><i>achikanainjia</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajüjia"><i>ajüjia</i><par n="contraseña__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajüttia"><i>ajüttia</i><par n="contraseña__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajüttiaapala"><i>ajüttiaapala</i><par n="teclado__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ajüttülee"><i>ajüttülee</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akaalijülü"><i>akaalijülü</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akaliaa"><i>akaliaa</i><par n="contraseña__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akalio'ushajülee"><i>akalio'ushajülee</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akuyamajülü"><i>akuyamajülü</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="a'atapjülü"><i>a'atapjülü</i><par n="contraseña__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alanale'ejia"><i>alanale'ejia</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amoutia"><i>amoutia</i><par n="teclado__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aaneekülee"><i>aneekülee</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anüikii"><i>anüikii</i><par n="contraseña__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apa'ajanaa"><i>apa'ajanaa</i><par n="ipa'__n"/></e>
    <e lm="musa"><i>musa</i><par n="musa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalina"><i>kalina</i><par n="kalina__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Camilo"><i>Camilo</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Olivia"><i>Olivia</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Amelia"><i>Amelia</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Alexandra"><i>Alexandra</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="María"><i>María</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Adriana"><i>Adriana</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Ángela"><i>Ángela</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Ana"><i>Ana</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Jazmín"><i>Jazmín</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Alejandra"><i>Alejandra</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Selena"><i>Selena</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Jimena"><i>Jimena</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Celeste"><i>Celeste</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Asia"><i>Asia</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Virginia"><i>Virginia</i><par n="Laura__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Benjamín"><i>Benjamín</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Juan"><i>Juan</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Alejandro"><i>Alejandro</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Óscar"><i>Óscar</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Andrés"><i>Andrés</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Francisco"><i>Francisco</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Héctor"><i>Héctor</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Pedro"><i>Pedro</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Lorenzo"><i>Lorenzo</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Jaime"><i>Jaime</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Hugo"><i>Hugo</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Noé"><i>Noé</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
 <e lm="Jairo"><i>Jairo</i><par n="Jaime__np"/></e>
    <e lm="yaa"><i>yaa</i><par n="yaa__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jamaa"><i>jamaa</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yootchon"><i>yootchon</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="meinshi"><i>meinshi</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jüchikua'ya"><i>jüchikua'ya</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="so'uka'i"><i>so'uka'i</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aliikainka"><i>aliikainka</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anooipa'a"><i>anooipa'a</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aipa'inka"><i>aipa'inka</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kale'u"><i>kale'u</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ne'e"><i>ne'e</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paülü'ü"><i>paülü'ü</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="watta'a"><i>watta'a</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yaawala"><i>yaawala</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eera"><i>eera</i><par n="hoy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jalaa"><i>jala</i><par n="jala/a__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="achumajaa"><i>achumaja</i><par n="achumajaa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aa'inraa"><i>aa'inraa</i><par n="jala/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aliika"><i>aliika</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="ounus taya"><i>ounus<b/>taya</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="anaa"><i>anaa</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="jalia"><i>jalia</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="anayawachijaa"><i>anayawachijaa</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="antüshi pia"><i>antüshi<b/>pia</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="antüshii jia"><i>antüshii<b/>jia</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="tane"><i>tane</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="nii wa'ira"><i>nii wa'ira</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="aa she"><i>aa<b/>she</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="anaa"><i>anaa</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="anuu"><i>anuu</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="jalairü"><i>jalairü</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="kaatei"><i>kaatei</i><par n="jamaya__ij"/></e>
<e lm="aalii"><i>aalii</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="achiirua"><i>achiirua</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="airu'u"><i>airu'u</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="akajee"><i>akajee</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="a'ütpa'a"><i>a'ütpa'a</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="alu'u"><i>alu'u</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="amüin"><i>amüin</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="anain"><i>anain</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="anainmüin"><i>anainmüin</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="apücho'u"><i>apücho'u</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="apülapünaa"><i>apülapünaa</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="asala"><i>asala</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="e'ipajee"><i>e'ipajee</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="o'unnaa"><i>o'unnaa</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="achikijee"><i>achikijee</i><par n="aashin__n"/></e>
<e lm="aka"><i>aka</i><par n="juma'a__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="jemiai"><i>jemiai</i><par n="jemiai__adj"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
